Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 29
COLORADO SEAL OF QUALITY

Section

35-29-101. Legislative declaration.

The purposes of this article are to provide a means whereby the general public purchasing certain Colorado agricultural products may be assured of the quality and grade of such products; to assure Colorado producers a better return from the sale of higher quality products; to establish a method of labeling and identification of such Colorado products so that purchasers may easily recognize them; to set up standards for quality, condition, packaging, and distribution of Colorado agricultural products so that the highest quality will be maintained until the product reaches the consumer; and to extend in every practicable way the production and sale of higher quality Colorado-produced agricultural products.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 173, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 7-18-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-16-1.

35-29-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Colorado agricultural products" means any agricultural, horticultural, viticultural, or vegetable products or poultry or poultry products grown or produced in the state of Colorado.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture.

"Consumer" means any person who buys Colorado agricultural products for personal use and not for resale.

"Container" means any box, carton, crate, bag, wrap, or other process or device used to hold and protect Colorado agricultural products. "Subcontainer" means any container being used within another container.

"Deceptive arrangement" or "deceptive display" means any bulk lot, arrangement, or display of products which has in the exposed surface products which are in quality, size, condition, or any other respect so superior to those which are concealed as to materially misrepresent the bulk lot, arrangement, or display.

"Deceptive pack" means any container or subcontainer which has in the outer layer or any exposed surface any products which are in quality, size, condition, or any other respect so superior to those in the interior of the container or subcontainer or in the unexposed portion as to materially misrepresent the contents.

"Department" means the department of agriculture.

"Distributor" means any person selling, marketing, or distributing Colorado agricultural products.

"Packer" means any person engaged in processing, packing, or preparing Colorado agricultural products for market.

"Person" means any individual, firm, association, corporation, or partnership.

"Producer" means any person engaged within this state in the business of producing or causing to be produced for market any agricultural commodity.

"Retailer" means any person buying Colorado agricultural products from producers, packers, or distributors and selling to consumers.

"Seal of quality" means the design approved by the commissioner, as provided in section 35-29-103 (2), as the Colorado "seal of quality" and which, when imprinted or affixed on labels, packages, or products or used in advertising or in any manner, shall signify the standards of quality provided in section 35-29-104.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 173, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 7-18-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-16-2.

35-29-103. Administration - seal of quality.

The commissioner and the representatives of the department under the direction of the commissioner shall administer and enforce this article; and, in such administration, the commissioner has and may exercise any or all the administrative powers conferred upon him as head of the department.

The commissioner shall produce or cause to be produced a suitable design or drawing, which shall be known as the Colorado seal of quality, to be used in the marketing of Colorado agricultural products.

The title to the seal of quality shall at all times remain in and be reserved to the department of agriculture.

The seal of quality, or any reproduction, copy, or facsimile thereof, may not be used in any advertising, display, labeling, or identification without prior written permission from the department.

When any producer, packer, distributor, or retailer has complied with the provisions of this article and the regulations pursuant thereto, he shall be permitted to use the seal of quality in advertising, labeling, or marketing his product.

The seal of quality may not be used on any agricultural product unless such product was produced in the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 174, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 7-18-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-16-3.

35-29-104. Standards of quality.

The department shall establish minimum standards of quality for all agricultural products to be marketed under the seal of quality.

The quality standards may be changed from time to time by the department, but any producer, packer, distributor, or retailer affected by the changes shall be notified by the department at least thirty days prior to the effective date of the changes in standards.

The seal of quality shall not be used in the marketing of any agricultural product which does not meet the minimum standards established by the department.

The commissioner shall prescribe methods and procedures of sampling, inspecting, and grading Colorado agricultural products.

Inspectors or representatives of the department shall use such methods and procedures in sampling, checking, and inspecting products to determine the grade, quality, or condition of the product being marketed under the seal of quality.

Any product being marketed under the seal of quality which does not meet the standards of quality established by the department shall be immediately removed from sale until the seal of quality has been removed from the product, label, or container. The department shall be the authority in making the decision to remove the product from sale. Any person refusing or failing to remove the seal of quality from a product, label, or container after being notified by the department shall be deemed in violation of this article.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 175, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 7-18-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-16-4.

35-29-105. Authority to enter, inspect, and take samples.

Any authorized representative of the department may enter and inspect any place where products being marketed under this article are being sold or offered for sale and take such samples as may be necessary to determine the grade, quality, or condition of the product.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 176, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 7-18-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-16-5.

35-29-106. Authority to make rules and regulations.

The department is granted power to make rules and regulations concerning standards for grade, size, quality, and condition of agricultural products being marketed under the seal of quality.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 176, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 7-18-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-16-6.

Cross references:

For rule-making procedures, see article 4 of title 24.

35-29-107. Financing.

To defray the expense of establishing the seal of quality program, the department is authorized to produce and sell labels, decals, stamps, mats, streamers, plates, or other forms of identification or advertising containing the seal of quality to be used by those persons marketing Colorado agricultural products under the seal of quality program. Any moneys received shall be placed in a revolving fund and shall only be used to replenish supplies and for advertising the seal of quality program, but the total net assets of the revolving fund, including accounts receivable, inventories, and cash balances, shall not exceed ten thousand dollars. Any net assets in excess of the limit established in this section for the revolving fund on hand at the close of each fiscal period shall be transferred to the general fund.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 176, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 7-18-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-16-7.

35-29-108. Unlawful acts.

It is unlawful for any person:

To sell or offer for sale any Colorado agricultural product identified by the seal of quality which does not meet the minimum standards established by the department;

To sell or offer for sale any agricultural product in any used container on which the seal of quality is printed, stamped, or affixed unless the seal of quality identification has been completely removed or obliterated;

To sell or offer for sale Colorado agricultural products bearing the seal of quality label in any container which does not meet the standards established by the department;

To sell or offer for sale any Colorado agricultural product in a deceptive pack or in a deceptive arrangement or deceptive display, as defined in section 35-29-102 (5) and (6);

To refuse to submit any Colorado agricultural product or container for inspection, sampling, or grading.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 176, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 7-18-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-16-8.

35-29-109. Penalties.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this article 29 commits a petty offense.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 177, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 7-18-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-16-9.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3279, § 628, effective March 1, 2022.